Montana, session 2025, HB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 7-15-4289, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-15-4289. Use of tax increments for bond payments -- public hearing requirement. (1) The tax
increment may be pledged to the payment of the principal of premiums, if any, and interest on bonds that the
local government may issue for the purpose of providing funds to pay those costs.
(2) Prior to pledging tax increment to the payment of bonds that will extend the termination of the
tax increment financing provision beyond the 15th year as provided in 7-15-4292, the legislative body of the
local government that approved adoption of the tax increment provision shall hold a public hearing on whether
fulfillment of the urban renewal plan or targeted economic development district comprehensive development
plan requires pledging tax increment to the payment of bonds. The local government shall provide notice of the
public hearing to the county and school district in which the urban renewal area or targeted economic
development district is located."
Section 2. Applicability. [This act] applies to a pledge of tax increment to the payment of bonds on
or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 19
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 19, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 19
INTRODUCED BY L. BREWSTER
BY REQUEST OF THE REVENUE INTERIM COMMITTEE
AN ACT REVISING TAX INCREMENT FINANCING LAWS TO REQUIRE A PUBLIC HEARING BEFORE
PLEDGING TAX INCREMENT TO THE PAYMENT OF BONDS THAT WILL EXTEND THE TERMINATION OF
A DISTRICT THAT USES TAX INCREMENT FINANCING; AMENDING SECTION 7-15-4289, MCA; AND
PROVIDING AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”